Washington statutes.
RCW 35.58.2795

Public transportation systems—Six-year transit plans.

By September 1st of each year, the legislative authority of each municipality, as defined in RCW 35.58.272, and each regional transit authority shall prepare a six-year transit development plan for that calendar year and the ensuing five years. The program shall be consistent with the comprehensive plans adopted by counties, cities, and towns, pursuant to chapter 35.63, 35A.63, or 36.70 RCW, the inherent authority of a first-class city or charter county derived from its charter, or chapter 36.70A RCW. The program shall contain information as to how the municipality intends to meet state and local long-range priorities for public transportation, capital improvements, significant operating changes planned for the system, and how the municipality intends to fund program needs. The six-year plan for each municipality and regional transit authority shall specifically set forth those projects of regional significance for inclusion in the transportation improvement program within that region. Each municipality and regional transit authority shall file the six-year program with the state department of transportation, the transportation improvement board, and cities, counties, and regional planning councils within which the municipality is located.

In developing its program, the municipality and the regional transit authority shall consider those policy recommendations affecting public transportation contained in the state transportation policy plan approved by the state transportation commission and, where appropriate, adopted by the legislature. The municipality shall conduct one or more public hearings while developing its program and for each annual update.

[ 2011 c 371 s 1; 1994 c 158 s 6; 1990 1st ex.s. c 17 s 60; 1989 c 396 s 1.]

NOTES:

Captions not law—Severability—Effective date—1994 c 158: See RCW 47.80.902 through 47.80.904.

Severability—Part, section headings not law—1990 1st ex.s. c 17: See RCW 36.70A.900 and 36.70A.901.